Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 295.50, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Gross revenues. new text begin (a) new text end "Gross revenues" are total amounts received in money or otherwise by: (1) a hospital for patient services; (2) a surgical center for patient services; (3) a health care provider, other than a staff model health plan company, for patient services; (4) a wholesale drug distributor for sale or distribution of legend drugs that are delivered in Minnesota by the wholesale drug distributor, by common carrier, or by mail, unless the legend drugs are delivered to another wholesale drug distributor who sells legend drugs exclusively at wholesale; and (5) a staff model health plan company as gross premiums for enrollees, co-payments, deductibles, coinsurance, and fees for patient services. new text begin (b) For a wholesale drug distributor under paragraph (a), clause (4), gross revenues also includes the amount of any rebate provided by the distributor to a customer, however provided, including a rebate provided under a contractual obligation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for gross revenues received after June 30, 2025. new text end